Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4131.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-607, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-607. Violation; classification A person who knowingly makes a false statement under oath, orally or written, of a material fact relating to any claim under the provisions of this article is guilty of a class 5 felony. END_STATUTE